test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-huuxa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - һууха: #

    һууха+V+FutPrc: һууха

    һууха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: һуунаб
    һууха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: һуунаш
    һууха+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: һууна
    һууха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: һуунабди
    һууха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: һуунат
    һууха+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: һууна

    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Sg1: һуубаб
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Sg2: һуубаш
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Sg3: һууба
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Pl1: һуубабди
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Pl2: һуубат
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Derm+Pl3: һууба

    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Sg1: һуулайб
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Sg2: һуулайш
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Sg3: һуулай
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Pl1: һуулайбди
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Pl2: һуулайт
    һууха+V+Ind+Prt+Conf+Pl3: һуулай

    һууха+V+Imp+Sg2: һуу
    һууха+V+Imp+Pl2: һуугты
    һууха+V+Opt+Sg1: һууһууб
    һууха+V+Opt+Pl1: һууһуубди
    һууха+V+Vol+Sg1: һууяа
    һууха+V+Vol+Pl1: [һууя, һууябди]

    һууха+V+FutPrc+Sg1: һуухаб
    һууха+V+FutPrc+Sg2: һуухаш
    һууха+V+FutPrc+Sg3: һууха
    һууха+V+FutPrc+Pl1: һуухабди
    һууха+V+FutPrc+Pl2: һуухат
    һууха+V+FutPrc+Pl3: һууха

    һууха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg1: һууааб
    һууха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg2: һууааш
    һууха+V+ImpfPrc+Sg3: һууаа
    һууха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl1: һууаабди
    һууха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl2: һууаат
    һууха+V+ImpfPrc+Pl3: һууаа

    һууха+V+HabPrc+Sg1: һуудагби
    һууха+V+HabPrc+Sg2: һуудагши
    һууха+V+HabPrc+Sg3: һуудаг
    һууха+V+HabPrc+Pl1: һуудагбди
    һууха+V+HabPrc+Pl2: һуудагта
    һууха+V+HabPrc+Pl3: һуудаг

    һууха+V+AgPrc+Sg1: һуугшаб
    һууха+V+AgPrc+Sg2: һуугшаш
    һууха+V+AgPrc+Sg3: һуугша
    һууха+V+AgPrc+Pl1: һуугшабди
    һууха+V+AgPrc+Pl2: һуугшат
    һууха+V+AgPrc+Pl3: һуугша

    һууха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg1: һууаашаб
    һууха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg2: һууаашаш
    һууха+V+AgConstPrc+Sg3: һууааша
    һууха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl1: һууаашабди
    һууха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl2: һууаашат
    һууха+V+AgConstPrc+Pl3: һууааша

    һууха+V+PerfPrc+Sg1: һууһанби
    һууха+V+PerfPrc+Sg2: һууһанши
    һууха+V+PerfPrc+Sg3: һууһан
    һууха+V+PerfPrc+Pl1: [һууһанбди, һууһамди]
    һууха+V+PerfPrc+Pl2: һууһанта
    һууха+V+PerfPrc+Pl3: һууһан

    һууха+V+PotPrc+Sg1: һуухаарби
    һууха+V+PotPrc+Sg2: һуухаарши
    һууха+V+PotPrc+Sg3: һуухаар
    һууха+V+PotPrc+Pl1: һуухаарбди
    һууха+V+PotPrc+Pl2: һуухаарта
    һууха+V+PotPrc+Pl3: һуухаар

    һууха+V+DualPrc+Sg1: һуумаарби
    һууха+V+DualPrc+Sg2: һуумаарши
    һууха+V+DualPrc+Sg3: һуумаар
    һууха+V+DualPrc+Pl1: һуумаарбди
    һууха+V+DualPrc+Pl2: һуумаарта
    һууха+V+DualPrc+Pl3: һуумаар

    һууха+V+PassPrc+Sg1: һууаатайб
    һууха+V+PassPrc+Sg2: һууаатайш
    һууха+V+PassPrc+Sg3: һууаатай
    һууха+V+PassPrc+Pl1: һууаатайбди
    һууха+V+PassPrc+Pl2: һууаатайт
    һууха+V+PassPrc+Pl3: һууаатай

    һууха+V+ResPrc+Sg1: һуунхайб
    һууха+V+ResPrc+Sg2: һуунхайш
    һууха+V+ResPrc+Sg3: һуунхай
    һууха+V+ResPrc+Pl1: һуунхайбди
    һууха+V+ResPrc+Pl2: һуунхайт
    һууха+V+ResPrc+Pl3: һуунхай

    һууха+V+ConMod: һуун
    һууха+V+ConImpf: һуужа
    һууха+V+ConPrf: һууаад
    һууха+V+ConCond: һуубал
    һууха+V+ConConc: һуубашье
    һууха+V+ConTerm: һуутар
    һууха+V+ConCntmp: һуумсаар
    һууха+V+ConAbtmp: һууһаар
    һууха+V+ConFin: һуухаар
    һууха+V+ConIntnt: һуухаяа
    һууха+V+ConSucc: һуухалаар
    һууха+V+ConCmp: һуунхаар
